California, session 20252026, AB1461.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 106.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:106.5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor may remove from office a member of a board or other licensing entity in the department if it is shown that such the member has knowledge of the specific questions to be asked on the licensing entity’s next examination and directly or indirectly discloses any such question or questions in advance of or during the examination to any applicant for that examination.The proceedings for removal shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the Governor shall have all the powers granted therein.